Utah statutes.
26-23b-110.   Information sharing with public safety authorities.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "public safety authority" means a local, state, or federal law enforcement authority including the Division of Emergency Management, emergency medical services personnel, and firefighters.

(2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act:

(a)  whenever a public safety authority suspects a case of a reportable illness or condition under the provisions of this chapter, it shall immediately notify the department;

(b)  whenever the department learns of a case of a reportable illness or condition under this chapter that it reasonably believes has the potential to be caused by one of the factors listed in Subsection 26-23b-103(1), it shall immediately notify the appropriate public safety authority; and

(c)  sharing of information reportable under the provisions of this chapter between persons authorized by this chapter shall be limited to information necessary for the treatment, control, investigation, and prevention of a public health emergency.

(3)  Except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter, Sections 26-6-27 and 26-6-28 apply to this chapter.

